District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.03

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 267, Pub. L. 85-569, § 3
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.03.
1981 Ed., § 29-503.
1973 Ed., § 29-1003.